Maryland, session 2026, HB0371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0371*

HOUSE BILL 371
Article – State Government
9–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Agency” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency.
(d) “Director” means the Director of the Agency.
(g) “License” means a license issued by the Director to act as a licensed agent.
(h) “Licensed agent” means a person or governmental unit licensed by the
Director to act as a State lottery sales agent.
9–111.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection AND §
9–111.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, the Agency may not allow the establishment of any system
or program that allows a person to purchase a State lottery ticket through an electronic
device that connects to the Internet, such as a personal computer or mobile device.
9–111.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COURIER SERVICE” MEANS THE PROCESS OF DELIVERING A
LOTTERY TICKET TO A PURCHASER THROUGH THE ONLINE ACCOUNT OF A LICENSED
COURIER.
(3) “LICENSED COURIER” MEANS A PERSON LICENSED BY THE
DIRECTOR TO CONDUCT COURIER SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(B) UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE, THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER §§ 9–112.1, 9–114, 9–115, AND 9–116 OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLY TO A
LICENSED COURIER.
(C) (1) THE DIRECTOR MAY ISSUE A COURIER LICENSE TO A PERSON TO
CONDUCT COURIER SERVICES IN THE STATE.
(2) A LICENSED COURIER MAY:
(I) ESTABLISH A SYSTEM OR PROGRAM THROUGH AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE THAT CONNECTS TO THE INTERNET THAT ALLOWS A PERSON

HOUSE BILL 371 3
IN THE STATE TO PURCHASE A LOTTERY TICKET THROUGH THE ONLINE ACCOUNT
OF THE LICENSED COURIER; AND
(II) ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A LICENSED AGENT TO
PURCHASE A LOTTERY TICKET TO FULFILL AN ORDER PLACED THROUGH THE
ONLINE ACCOUNT OF THE LICENSED COURIER.
(3) AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN A LICENSED COURIER AND A LICENSED
AGENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL BE DISCLOSED TO THE AGENCY; AND
(II) IS NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DIRECTOR SHALL:
(I) NOTWITHSTANDING § 9–124(B)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE,
ALLOW A LICENSED COURIER TO CHARGE A CUSTOMER A SERVICE FEE THAT IS A
PERCENTAGE OF THE AMOUNT DEPOSITED BY THE CUSTOMER INTO THE
CUSTOMER’S ACCOUNT; AND
(II) ENSURE THAT:
1. ANY FEE THAT THE LICENSED COURIER CHARGES FOR
A TRANSACTION IS CLEARLY DISPLAYED ON THE LICENSED COURIER’S MOBILE
APPLICATION AND WEBSITE;
2. THE CUSTOMER AFFIRMATIVELY ACCEPTS AND
CONSENTS TO THE LICENSED COURIER’S FEE BEFORE THE TRANSACTION IS
COMPLETED; AND
3. THE CUSTOMER IS CHARGED NO OTHER FEE FOR
USING THE COURIER SERVICES.
(2) THE DIRECTOR MAY NOT ALLOW A PORTION OR PERCENTAGE OF
A CUSTOMER’S LOTTERY WINNINGS TO BE CHARGED, ACCEPTED, GIVEN, OR PAID TO
THE LICENSED COURIER AS A FEE.
(E) A LICENSED COURIER SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN AN INTERNET WEBSITE THAT:

HOUSE BILL 371
(I) IDENTIFIES ITSELF AS THE WEBSITE OF THE LICENSED
COURIER; AND
(II) DISPLAYS A PROBLEM GAMBLING ASSISTANCE MESSAGE
PROMINENTLY;
(2) SAFEGUARD THE PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION OF A
LICENSED COURIER’S CUSTOMERS, INCLUDING DEBIT CARD NUMBER, BANK
ACCOUNT INFORMATION, AND OTHER SIMILAR INFORMATION;
(3) VERIFY THE IDENTITY, AGE, AND PHYSICAL LOCATION OF THE
CUSTOMER UTILIZING THE COURIER SERVICE TO ENSURE TRANSACTIONS ARE
OCCURRING IN THE STATE;
(4) REDEEM A PRIZE FROM A LOTTERY TICKET ON BEHALF OF THE
CUSTOMER UTILIZING THE COURIER SERVICE IN A SECURE MANNER;
(5) SECURELY STORE THE TICKET PURCHASED ON BEHALF OF THE
COURIER SERVICE CUSTOMER IN LIEU OF DELIVERY;
(6) PROVIDE AN ELECTRONIC COPY OF THE TICKET PURCHASED
DISPLAYING THE CUSTOMER’S NUMBERS AND OTHER INFORMATION FROM THE
TICKET ON THE RECEIPT;
(7) REQUIRE THE CUSTOMER TO CLAIM ANY PRIZE OVER $600 IN
PERSON;
(8) PROVIDE THE CUSTOMER WITH THE OPTION TO OBTAIN THE
ORIGINAL TICKET;
(9) STORE A TICKET AND MAINTAIN A SECURE DATABASE OF ALL
STORED LOTTERY TICKETS, LINKED TO EACH RESPECTIVE CUSTOMER; AND
(10) NOTIFY THE CUSTOMER OF A WINNING TICKET AND ITS PRIZE
VALUE WITHIN 24 HOURS OF A DRAWING.
(F) THE DIRECTOR MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) LIMIT THE NUMBER OF TERMINALS THAT A LICENSED COURIER
MAY USE FOR COURIER SERVICES AT A SINGLE LOCATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 371 5
(2) ESTABLISH QUALIFICATION STANDARDS FOR LICENSED
COURIERS AND THEIR EMPLOYEES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.